Wyoming, session 2026, SF0114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-30-101 through 22-30-103 are
created to read:

CHAPTER 30
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
ELECTION OF STATE REPRESENTATIVES

22-30-101. General elections for state
representatives; ballot design and format.

(a) At each general election, there shall be elected
for each district a number of representatives for the state
legislature as provided for in W.S. 28-2-119.

(b) The ballot for electing representatives at the
general election shall include:

(i) The name of each political party that
nominates a list of candidates in all capital letters,
followed by the phrase "List of Candidates" and the names
of the nominated candidates in the order of their
nomination;

(ii) The name of candidates nominated by
petition, followed by the phrase "By Petition" and the name
of each candidate.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
(c) Candidates nominated by petition shall be treated
as a list consisting of a single candidate.

(d) Voters may vote for one (1) list of candidates in
the same manner as for individual candidates for other
offices in lieu of selecting individual candidates for the
office of representative.

22-30-102. Nominations of candidates for state
representatives; primary elections.

(a) Nominated lists of candidates for representatives
in each district shall consist of a number of candidates
equal to or less than the number of representatives to be
elected in a particular district, with the ordering of each
nominated candidate on the list determined according to the
political party's chosen nominating method.

(b) Not later than June 1 in every even-numbered
year, the chairman of the state central committee of each
political party shall certify to the secretary of state the
committee's choice as to the method of nominating
candidates for representatives. Each political party's
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
chosen nomination method shall be applied uniformly in all
districts.

(c) The state central committee of each major
political party may choose for the party to nominate lists
of candidates using the primary election. For major
political parties choosing to nominate by primary election,
voters in the primary election may vote for as many
candidates in an amount equal to or less than the number of
representatives to be elected. For the general election,
the candidates nominated shall be ordered on the nominated
list according to the respective number of votes received
in the primary election, with the candidate receiving the
most votes assigned the first position on the candidate
list and continuing in the same manner until the number of
candidates equals or does not exceed the number of
representatives to be selected. Ties shall be resolved in
accordance with W.S. 22-16-119.

(d) For major political parties choosing not to
nominate by primary election and for all minor political
parties, the state central committee of the party shall
provide for the party to nominate lists of candidates for
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
representative under rules as the state central committee
may adopt, including but not limited to the use of
conventions, caucuses or party committees. The method for
nomination shall be applied uniformly in all districts. A
copy of the party's rules adopted under this subsection
shall be included with the nomination method certification
submitted to the secretary of state under subsection (b) of
this section.

(e) Nominations of candidate lists by parties not
using a primary election shall be certified to the
secretary of state by the chairman and secretary of the
political party's state central committee not later than
the date of the primary election specified in W.S.
22-2-104(b).

22-30-103. General elections for representatives;
apportionment of elected candidates.

(a) The representatives elected for each house
district specified in W.S. 28-2-119 shall be apportioned
among the nominated candidate lists according to the
respective number of votes received in the general
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
election, using the greatest divisors method or Jefferson
method for calculating apportionments. Ties in the
apportionment of representatives shall be resolved in
accordance with W.S. 22-16-119.

(b) The individual representatives elected from each
list of candidates shall be determined according to their
ordering on the list, starting with the first candidate and
proceeding until the number of representatives elected is
equal to the number to which the list is entitled.

(c) If a list is entitled to more representatives
elected than there were candidates nominated on that list,
all of the candidates from the exhausted list are deemed to
be elected, with the remaining available positions for
representative apportioned among the unexhausted lists
according to the respective number of votes.

Section 2. W.S. 22-2-117(a), 22-4-303, 22-5-215,
22-5-304(c), 22-6-120(a)(iii), (iv), (vii) and (ix),
22-6-121(a), 22-6-122 and 22-16-103(a)(ii) and
(c)(viii)(C)(I) are amended to read:

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
22-2-117. Vote required for election; ratification.

(a) Partisan and nonpartisan candidates who receive
the largest number of votes for each office to be filled at
the general election are elected. State representatives
shall be apportioned by votes for lists as provided in W.S.
22-30-103. Nothing in this election code shall be deemed to
authorize any election in Wyoming to be conducted through
ranked choice voting. Any existing or future ordinance
enacted or adopted by a county, municipality or any other
governmental entity that purports to authorize ranked
choice voting in violation of this subsection is void. As
used in this subsection, "ranked choice voting" means a
voting method that allows voters to rank candidates for an
office in order of preference and has ballots cast to be
tabulated in multiple rounds following the elimination of a
candidate until the candidate or candidates with the most
votes are declared winners, or any other system that allows
a voter to vote for more than the number of candidates
permitted to fill a particular office.

22-4-303. Nomination of candidates.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
Minor parties may nominate candidates to be placed on the
general election ballot only by party convention, subject
to the nomination of candidates for the office of state
representative under W.S. 22-30-102(d). Under no
circumstances shall a minor political party nominate by the
primary election process.

22-5-215. Nomination of partisan candidates and
write-in candidates.

On each party ballot the candidate or candidates equal in
number to the number to be elected to each office who
receive the largest number of votes shall be nominated and
shall be entitled to have their names printed on the ballot
for the next general election. Nomination of candidates for
the office of state representative shall be in accordance
with W.S. 22-30-101 through 22-30-103. A write-in candidate
shall not be nominated and shall not be entitled to have
his name printed on the ballot for the next general
election unless he received at least twenty-five (25)
write-in votes in the primary election and is a registered
voter in the political party for which he was nominated on
the day of the primary election. An unsuccessful candidate
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
for office at a primary election whose name is printed on
any party ballot may not accept nomination for the same
office at the next general election.

22-5-304. Qualifications and number of signers
required.

(c) For a district partisan election, a petition
shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the
district and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering
not less than two percent (2%) of the total number of votes
cast for the office in that particular district in the last
general election. If a district's boundaries have changed
since the last general election, then the required number
of petition signatures shall not be less than two percent
(2%) of the number of registered voters in the current
district boundaries at the close of day on the day
immediately preceding the primary election. For the
nomination of candidates for state representative, the
required number of petition signatures shall be further
divided by the number of representatives to be elected from
the district.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
22-6-120. Format of general election ballot.

(a) The general election ballot shall be printed in
substantial compliance with this format:

(iii) On the second line shall be printed the
same following instructions: as prescribed for primary
elections in W.S. 22-6-119 "To vote for a person whose name
or a list of names that is printed on the ballot, mark the
square immediately adjacent to the name of the person or
list for whom you desire to vote. To vote for a person
whose name is not printed on the ballot, write the person's
name in the blank space provided for that purpose and mark
the square immediately adjacent to the name of the
person.";

(iv) The designation of offices and the
applicable term of office shall be printed preceding the
names and lists of candidates for the office;

(vii) Except for elections for state
representatives in accordance with W.S. 22-30-101 through
22-30-103, the names of partisan party candidates, if
SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
candidates have filed, and independent candidates, if
candidates have filed, shall be printed in a separate
column or columns, row or rows, and the name of the party
represented or the word "Independent" shall be printed
directly above the candidate's name or at the end of the
row. If there are a number of candidates representing a
party, or independents, the county clerk at his discretion
may designate a separate vertical column or columns, or row
or rows to said candidates and print the name of said party
or the word "Independent" at the top of the column or
beginning of the row;

(ix) Except for elections for state
representatives in accordance with W.S. 22-30-101 through
22-30-103, for offices to which more than one (1) person is
to be elected, the names of candidates in each column
running for the office shall be offset or staggered to
prevent two (2) names from appearing directly opposite each
other;

22-6-121. Political party ballot position on general
election ballot; order of candidates' names.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
(a) Political party position shall be determined on
the general election ballot according to the number of
votes received by each party within the county for the
office of representative in congress at the last preceding
general election. The party receiving the highest number
of votes shall appear first following the names of the
offices to be voted for and other parties shall follow in
the order of their respective numbers of such votes. The
order of any provisional parties will be drawn by the
secretary of state. Any independent candidates shall
appear following the last party and shall be listed in
alphabetical order, subject to rotation. When more than
one (1) candidate is to be elected to a particular office
except for elections for state representatives under W.S.
22-30-101 through 22-30-103, the names of candidates shall
be printed in alphabetical order, subject to rotation, on
all ballots for electronic and machine voting systems as
defined by W.S. 22-1-102.

22-6-122. Rotation of candidates' names; equal lines
on voting machines.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
Except for elections for state representatives under W.S.
22-30-101 through 22-30-103, the names of candidates for
each office shall be rotated on all ballots by precinct for
all elections. In each county the name of each candidate
shall appear substantially an equal number of times at the
top, at the bottom, and in each intermediate place. In a
voting machine polling place, if candidates for the same
office occupy more than one (1) line on the voting machine,
the number of names appearing on each line shall be as
nearly equal as possible.

22-16-103. County canvass procedures.

(a) Prior to the county canvass, the county clerk
shall:

(ii) Summarize the number of votes cast in each
precinct for every candidate and list of candidates
appearing on the ballot and the total votes cast for
write-in candidates, and upon each ballot proposition;

(c) The county canvassing board shall:

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
(viii) Ensure abstracts contain the following
information:

(C) The full name of each of the following
receiving votes:

(I) Candidates and lists of candidates
printed on the ballot;

Section 3. W.S. 28-2-119 is repealed and recreated to
read:

28-2-119. House legislative districts; number of
representatives.

(a) Subsection (b) of this section creates
legislative districts for the Wyoming house of
representatives, consisting of the numbered legislative
districts contained therein. There shall be a number of
representatives elected from each house legislative
district as specified in subsection (b) of this section.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
(b) House districts shall consist of the entirety of
the geographic areas of the counties, with the number of
representatives to be elected from each district as
follows:

(i) House district 1: Natrona county; nine (9)
representatives;

(ii) House district 2: Campbell county and Crook
county; six (6) representatives;

(iii) House district 3: Laramie county; eleven
(11) representatives;

(iv) House district 4: Sweetwater county and
Carbon county; six (6) representatives;

(v) House district 5: Fremont county; four (4)
representatives;

(vi) House district 6: Albany county; four (4)
representatives;

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
(vii) House district 7: Sheridan county, Johnson
county, Big Horn county, Washakie county and Hot Springs
county; seven (7) representatives;

(viii) House district 8: Teton county and Park
county; six (6) representatives;

(ix) House district 9: Uinta county, Lincoln
county and Sublette county; five (5) representatives;

(x) House district 10: Converse county, Platte
county and Goshen county; four (4) representatives;

(xi) House district 11: Weston county and
Niobrara county; one (1) representative.

Section 4. This act shall apply to the election of
representatives to the Wyoming house of representatives
commencing with the 2026 primary and general elections.

SF0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0505
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0114